District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.106

Repealed

Foreign corporations — Registered office and registered agent.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 222, ch. 269, § 106
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(mm), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-933g.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.7.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.106.